Hawaii statutes.
§612-15 Certified jury lists. (a)
Every year, the clerk of each circuit shall make and file, not later than
January 5, one or more certified lists of the names and addresses of such
number of persons as the court may order, subject to serve as grand jurors
during the ensuing year from and after January 15. Every year, the clerk of
each circuit shall likewise make and file, not later than December 20, a
separate certified list of the names and addresses of citizens subject to serve
as trial jurors during the ensuing year, from and after January 1, the number
for each circuit, which shall be as the clerk considers necessary. The
certified lists of prospective grand jurors and trial jurors shall be compiled
from names drawn at random from the qualified jury wheel, and shall be prepared
in alphabetical sequence. Upon the order of the court, from time to time,
additional lists of persons subject to serve as grand jurors shall be compiled
and filed, and additional names shall be added to a grand or trial jury list;
provided that all additions shall be made by drawing from the qualified jury
wheel for the appropriate year. When more than one grand jury list has been
compiled, the sequence in which the lists are to be used shall be designated by
the clerk according to the sequence of drawing. The names on the certified
lists shall be open to public inspection, after redaction of addresses and
other personal information and identifiers, subject to orders of the court.

(b) In the second, third, and fifth circuits,
any circuit judge, and in the first circuit, a majority of the circuit judges,
at any time, for reasons appearing sufficient to the judge or them, may order
the dissolution of any certified list of prospective grand or trial jurors and
order the clerk to make and file a new list, which may include any of the
persons so discharged, to serve for the remainder of the year. The new list
shall be compiled in the manner prescribed by the court. Until the new list is
filed, grand or trial jurors may be drawn from a list thereof compiled and
filed by the judge or judges making the order or one or more of them designated
by the remainder, which list shall expire not later than thirty days after the
filing thereof unless the period is extended, except that trial jurors may sit
beyond the end of the period prescribed in this subsection and after the filing
of a new list by the clerk, for the trial of any case in which the selection of
the jury has already commenced. [L 1973, c 191, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1987,
c 366, §8; am L 1993, c 159, §1; am L 2002, c 92, §4; am L 2007, c 122, §10]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next